Utah statutes.
58-72-401.   Grounds for denial of license -- Disciplinary proceedings -- Resumption of practice.

Grounds for refusal to issue a license to an applicant, for refusal to renew the license of a licensee, to revoke, suspend, restrict, or place on probation the license of a licensee, to issue a public or private reprimand to a licensee, and to issue cease and desist orders shall be in accordance with Section 58-1-401.

